Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB207.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 303(a)(1)(i) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 303. Classes of Income.--(a) The classes of income referred to above are as follows:(1) Compensation.(i) All salaries, wages, commissions, bonuses and incentive payments whether based on profits or otherwise, fees, tips and similar remuneration received for services rendered whether 12345678910111213141516171819202122 directly or through an agent and whether in cash or in property except income derived from the United States Government for active duty outside the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania as a member of its armed forces and income from the United States Government or the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania for active State duty for emergency within or outside the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, including duty ordered pursuant to 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 76 (relating to Emergency Management Assistance Compact). The exception in this subparagraph for a member of the armed forces includes income of the spouse of such member, provided the spouse resides with the member outside the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0207PN0155 - 2 - 1234567891011121314